Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-1405
Child support; liability of parents; discharge by settlement; requirements.

(1) A settlement provided for in section 43-1404 means a voluntary agreement:

(a) That is between:

(i) The father of the child and the mother or some person authorized to act in her behalf;

(ii) The father and the next friend or guardian of the child;

(iii) A parent of a child adopted by a second adult person under subdivision (1)(c) of section 43-101 and the other such parent or some person authorized to act in such other parent's behalf; or

(iv) A parent of a child adopted by a second adult person under subdivision (1)(c) of section 43-101 and the next friend or guardian of the child; and

(b) Whereby the father or parent promises to make adequate provision for the support of the child.

(2) In the event that such a settlement is made it shall be binding on all parties and shall bar all other remedies of the mother and child, any other parent, and the legal representatives of the child so long as the settlement is performed by the parent promising to provide support, if such settlement is approved by the court having jurisdiction to compel the support of the child.

(3) The court shall approve such settlement only if the court finds and determines that adequate provision is made for the support of the child and that the promising parent has offered clear evidence of willingness and ability to perform the agreement. The court, in its discretion, may require the promising parent to furnish bond with proper sureties conditioned upon the performance of the settlement.

Laws 1941, c. 81, § 5, p. 323;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-705;

R.S.1943, § 13-105;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 13-105;

Laws 2026, LB70, § 13.
July 18, 2026